Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 23

Department of Transportation

4-3-2301. Creation.

There is hereby established the department of transportation.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-309; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The department of transportation, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

For additional provisions relating to the termination of the department of transportation, see the Compiler's Notes under §4-3-101.

Acts 2003, ch. 213, § 1 provided that in recognition of a growing public interest in improving the transportation planning process and customer service by the department of transportation, it is the intent of the general assembly to authorize the commissioner of transportation to reorganize the department as appropriate to address existing and future demands for improved services.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of transportation, §4-3-101.

4-3-2302. Commissioner — Qualifications — Appointment — Salary — Vacancy or absence.

The administrator and head of the department shall be the commissioner of transportation, who shall be a person qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of the commissioner's office.

The commissioner shall be appointed by the governor.

The commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and shall receive a salary in accordance with § 8-23-101.

In the event of death, resignation, temporary incapacity or removal of the commissioner, and prior to the appointment of the commissioner's successor, the governor may appoint a qualified employee of the department of transportation to serve as acting commissioner. The commissioner may appoint, during the commissioner's absence from the state, a qualified employee of the department to serve as acting commissioner for the duration of the absence. In either case, the acting commissioner shall have all the duties, functions and powers of the commissioner during the commissioner's absence or incapacity, or until the commissioner's successor is duly qualified and appointed.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-309; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 25.

4-3-2303. Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner has the power and duty to:

Retain, employ and contract for the services of private and public consultants, research and technical personnel and procure by contract, consulting, research, technical and other services and facilities, whenever considered by the commissioner necessary or desirable in the performance of the functions of the department and whenever funds shall be available for those purposes;

Establish and promulgate such rules and regulations governing the administration and operation of the department as may be deemed necessary by the commissioner and that are not inconsistent with the laws of this state;

Maintain such facilities throughout the state as may be required for the effective and efficient operation of the department;

Apply for and accept on behalf of the state any grant from the federal government to be used for any of the purposes of the department, and to comply with any conditions and limitations annexed;

Supervise, direct and account for the administration and operation of the department and its employees;

Organize the department into such units as the commissioner deems necessary to carry out the duties and functions imposed on the commissioner and the department. Any reorganization or creation or elimination of any units after July 1, 2003, shall be jointly reviewed by the officers of the house of representatives and senate finance, ways and means committees and the officers of the transportation committee of the house of representatives and the transportation and safety committee of the senate, it being the intent of the general assembly to recognize the organization of the department as of July 1, 2003, as the legal organization of the department;

Appoint such personnel as may be necessary for the administration and operation of the department, within reasonable budgetary limitations;

Delegate any of the commissioner's powers, duties or functions to a departmental employee of the commissioner's choosing, except the commissioner's power to remove employees of the department or to fix their compensation;

Undertake programs of transportation related to investigation, research and operation of safe, adequate and efficient transportation modes, including, but not limited to, aeronautics, waterways, rails, highways and mass transit;

Provide technical assistance and financial assistance, as it may become available, to other public agencies;

Develop and implement a continuing, comprehensive, and multimodal statewide transportation planning process that is consistent with the transportation planning requirements of the United States department of transportation and includes the development and periodic updating of a long-range statewide transportation plan, including: consideration and provision, as applicable, of elements and connections of and between highway, rail, mass transit, waterway, aviation, pedestrian and bicycle facilities; consideration of operations and maintenance of those facilities; and a review of projected costs and anticipated revenues;

Plan, propose and coordinate transportation related policies, activities and programs among state departments and agencies and within the state;

Prepare and report annually to the general assembly an updated multimodal transportation improvement program for the state, which shall be based on the long-range statewide transportation plan and shall provide the basis for annual funding recommendations by the commissioner and for annual expenditures by the department;

Administer a statewide rideshare/car pooling program, including the establishment of appropriate rideshare parking locations on the perimeter of major urban areas or other areas needing such facilities, as determined by the commissioner;

Document and evaluate the cost-effectiveness of contracting maintenance work with private vendors;

Develop a plan to establish and maintain long-term, cost-effective highway condition ratings;

Develop, document and demonstrate to the general assembly a system of accountability over transportation field units;

Exercise all duties, responsibilities and powers granted the department in title 65, chapters 3, 11, and 12, and establish and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of title 65, chapters 3, 11, and 12; and

Solely at the commissioner's discretion, upon awarding federal transportation enhancement grant funds to be used for the acquisition, preservation or protection of civil war battlefield sites or related properties or easements, the commissioner may contract directly with any established and nationally recognized nonprofit organization dedicated to the preservation of civil war battlefields; provided, that the commissioner finds that the organization complies with federal eligibility requirements for grantees of such enhancement grant funds.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 5; 1973, ch. 140, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-309; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 24; 1983, ch. 429, § 10; 1986, ch. 541, § 1; 1987, ch. 76, §§ 3, 4; 1995, ch. 305, § 63; 2003, ch. 213, § 2; 2007, ch. 41, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 960, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 89.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the rest area system, excluding the rest area in Smith County, in the department of tourist development and its related functions to the department of transportation, see Executive Order No. 44 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Duties of commissioner, §54-1-105.

Highways, title 54.

Ramp installation at crosswalks, department to furnish specifications, §7-31-114.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

Attorney General Opinions. Reorganization of department of transportation, OAG 00-037, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (3/7/00).

Commissioner's authority to investigate safe, adequate and efficient modes of transportation does not give him the regulatory power to investigate alleged violations of the Tennessee Water Quality Control Act, OAG 04-035, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (3/09/04).

4-3-2304. Accessible transportation and mobility.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Accessible Transportation and Mobility Act of 2020.”

At the direction of the commissioner, the department shall create and administer an office within the department to be known as the office of accessible transportation and mobility.

The purpose of the office is to provide resources and expertise for expanding and improving accessible transportation and mobility across the state at the direction of the commissioner.

All appropriate state and local agencies shall coordinate with the department of transportation toward the goal of expanding and improving accessible transportation and mobility across the state.

The office shall consult with stakeholders, selected by the department, who are consumers of accessible transportation as well as professionals with experience in transportation, disability, and aging to produce the following on or before March 31, 2021:

A detailed statement on the office's mission and scope of responsibilities;

A five-year strategic plan to guide the office's work; and

A report to the chairs of the transportation committee of the house of representatives and the transportation and safety committee of the senate and to the public regarding needs for mobility and accessible transportation in the state, which is to be submitted annually thereafter.

Acts 2020, ch. 600, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-2304 (Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 33; Shan. Supp., § 373a85b; Code 1932, § 308; Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 54, 55; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.54; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1972, ch. 829, §§ 3-6, 20, 23; 1973, ch. 140, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-309), concerning the creation, powers and duties of the various bureaus of the department of transportation, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 3. For present provisions, see §4-3-2303.

4-3-2305. Compliance.

The department of transportation shall comply with all the terms and conditions of the disadvantaged business enterprise and historically underutilized business enterprise provisions of the federal Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century (23 U.S.C. § 101 et seq.)

In addition to subsection (a), the department shall continue to comply with the good faith efforts requirements of § 67-3-904, which apply to the revenue generated from the 1986 and 1989 gasoline tax increases with respect to disadvantaged business enterprises or women business enterprises.

It being in the public interest and for a public purpose to support the participation of small businesses in department contracts, the department is authorized to establish the programs described in this section to assist small businesses to participate in department contracts, either as a prime or as a subcontractor. Small business shall be defined to include certified disadvantaged business enterprises as defined by 49 CFR Part 26, and business enterprises that satisfy all the requirements of a disadvantaged business enterprise under Part 26, including but not limited to, requirements of business size and net worth of owners, other than the requirement that the owners of the business qualify as members of the groups identified in subsection 2 of the definition of socially and economically disadvantaged individuals in 49 CFR Part 26.5. The commissioner may promulgate rules to implement the purpose of this section.

The department is authorized to conduct studies to determine whether any group consisting of socially and economically disadvantaged individuals as defined in 49 CFR Part 26 is underutilized on state funded construction projects. In the event underutilization is documented and any other necessary findings are made, the commissioner may elect to set appropriate goals on state funded projects.

The department is authorized to offer construction management development programs for small businesses and may charge a fee for the programs.

The department is authorized to create and implement a surety bond guarantee program for small businesses to act as subcontractors on department construction projects. The state may guarantee up to ninety percent (90%) of a surety bond amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or less and up to eighty percent (80%) of a surety bond amount greater than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), which surety bond is provided by an approved surety. The department may be entitled to receive a fee from a participating small business and may require any participating small business to set aside part of the subcontract amount as security for the surety bond or guarantee, or both. The department is required to promulgate rules to effectuate this subsection (c). In no event shall the total amount guaranteed under this program at any given time exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The department is authorized to expend funds from the highway fund to fund administrative expenses and fund any losses that may arise under the surety bond guarantee program.

The commissioner shall report in writing the progress of this program to any member of the general assembly upon request. The report shall include, as a minimum, the number of users of the surety bond guarantee plan; the number of defaults and dollar loss; the cost of the program categorized by cost of administration; and the cost of on-the-job and classroom instruction.

Acts 2000, ch. 820, § 2; 2004, ch. 641, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 88; 2013, ch. 308, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 820, § 1 provided that the act may be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Minority and Women Business Enterprise Act of 2000”.

Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 88 amended the first sentence of subdivision (c)(4), effective April 19, 2013, to read: “Annually, the commissioner shall report in writing the progress of this program to the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the governor, members of the house of representatives transportation committee, and members of the transportation and safety committee of the senate.” Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 20 rewrote the first sentence of subdivision (c)(4), effective July 1, 2013, to read: “The commissioner shall report in writing the progress of this program to any member of the general assembly upon request.” The amendment by ch. 236 was in effect from April 19, 2013, until July 1, 2013. The amendment by ch. 308 took effect on July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Enhanced policymaking role for minority business, §4-3-732.

Funds for contracts with disadvantaged business concerns or enterprises, §54-1-124.

4-3-2306. Transportation Information Planning Act of 2001.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Information Planning Act of 2001.”

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Planning of Tennessee's transportation system is vital to ensuring that Tennessee's transportation needs are met now and in the future;

The general assembly and the public's ability to be informed and involved in the planning and implementation of Tennessee's transportation system will add value to ensuring a transportation system that meets the needs of Tennessee's citizens; and

With the emergence of new information technology, access to planning documentation can and should be made more readily available to the public.

In order to facilitate the dissemination of information to the citizens of Tennessee, the department of transportation shall post the following documents or information on its internet website:

A copy of the most current statewide transportation plan required pursuant to § 4-3-2303(13); and

Information identifying and explaining the types of planning information available from the department and the procedures for obtaining each type of such information from the department.

Acts 2001, ch. 248, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The URL of the web site for the Tennessee department of transportation is tn.gov/tdot.

4-3-2307. Travel and tourism signage programs.

The commissioner is authorized to develop guidelines for municipal tourism/wayfinding informational signage programs. Such guidelines may include, but are not limited to, construction, placement and safety standards. The commissioner is urged to consult with interested municipalities in the development of this program. Such municipalities may participate in the development of such guidelines; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring any municipality to participate in, or undertake construction of, a municipal tourism/wayfinding information signage program.

The commissioner of transportation is authorized to develop guidelines for optional county/municipal tourism/wayfinding informational signage programs within any municipality having a population in excess of one hundred fifty-five thousand (155,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or within any county. Such guidelines may include, but are not limited to, construction, placement and safety standards. The commissioner is urged to consult with interested parties within any county or municipality desiring to participate in the development of this program. Such county or municipality may participate in the development of such guidelines; provided, that nothing in this subsection (b) shall be construed as requiring participation or to undertake construction of a county/municipal tourism/wayfinding information signage program.

The department of transportation is hereby authorized to remove any signs from the federal interstate highway system within any participating county or municipality that were installed as a result of acts or resolutions of the Tennessee general assembly; provided that the entity or facility which is signed agrees in writing that the entity or facility's interstate guide sign and any associated ramp sign may be removed as part of the overall plan for the tourism/wayfinding informational signage program implemented by such county or municipality.

Acts 2003, ch. 382, § 1; 2010, ch. 727, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 382, § 2 provided that the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this section.

Acts 2010, ch. 727, § 3 provided that all funds for the tourism/wayfinding informational signage program to which subsection (c) applies shall be provided by the respective local government of each participating county or municipality as to the signs within their program.

4-3-2308. Sponsorship program for welcome centers or rest areas.

The department of transportation may establish a sponsorship program that allows a person or entity to sponsor a welcome center or rest area. The department may consult the departments of safety and tourist development in developing the program. The department may enter into a sponsorship for the welcome centers and rest areas and acknowledge a sponsor for the provision of services, products, or monetary contributions. The sponsorship program authorized in this section shall be distinct from, and shall not impair, any commercial advertising or any other tourism promotion program operated by the department of tourist development within welcome centers.

A sponsorship program shall allow the installation of acknowledgment signs or markers, or the inclusion of sponsorship messages on existing signs or markers, within the rest areas and welcome centers, and on the portions of the interstate system and state system of highways and associated rights-of-way near the rest areas and welcome centers.

The department shall prefer sponsorship by persons or entities that have a transportation purpose or otherwise promote highway safety.

This section does not authorize signs or markers, or inclusion of sponsorship messages, that advertise or promote commercial products or services through slogans, information on where to obtain the products and services, or other means.

Sponsorship agreements, sponsorship policies, and signs or markers authorized under this section shall be consistent with:

The Manual on Uniform Traffic Safety Devices;

Order 5160.1A, Policy on Sponsorship Acknowledgment and Agreements within the Highway Right-of-Way dated April 7, 2014, issued by the federal highway administration; and

Other applicable state and federal laws and guidelines.

A person or entity that enters into a sponsorship agreement with the department for a sponsorship shall pay the costs of:

Manufacturing and installing a sign or marker;

Placing a sponsorship message on a sign or marker; and

Removing a sponsorship message, sign, or marker after the expiration or termination of the sponsorship agreement.

The revenue generated from a sponsorship for any facilities on which federal-aid funds are used shall be deposited into the highway fund to be used solely for highway purposes. The revenue generated from a sponsorship for any facilities on which federal-aid funds are not used shall be deposited into the highway fund to be used to offset costs associated with providing the facility being sponsored or for highway purposes; provided, that the department is urged to use the revenue for highway purposes. This section does not authorize nor apply to commercial advertising in kiosks or any other tourism promotion program operated within welcome centers. The revenue generated from such commercial advertising and tourism promotion programs shall be allocated to the department of tourist development and used for purposes set forth in §§ 4-3-2201 – 4-3-2209.

If the department establishes a sponsorship program, then the department shall adopt a sponsorship policy on sponsorship agreements that applies to all welcome centers and rest areas along the highways of the interstate system and state system of highways and associated highways and highway rights-of-way; provided, that provisions of the policy regarding welcome centers shall be developed in cooperation with the department of tourist development. The sponsorship policy shall:

Be subject to approval by the federal highway administration;

Include requirements that eligible sponsors comply with state and federal laws prohibiting discrimination based on race, color, national origin, age, sex, religion, disability, or any other category under applicable laws;

Include language requiring the department to terminate a sponsorship agreement, if it determines the sponsorship agreement or acknowledgment sign or marker:

Presents a safety concern;

Interferes with the free and safe flow of traffic; or

Is not in the public interest; and

Describe the types of sponsors and sponsorship agreements that are acceptable and consistent with applicable state and federal laws.

A sponsorship message:

Shall identify the sponsor as a sponsor of the welcome center or rest area and include only the name and logo of the sponsor;

Shall not include, identify, or promote:

Alcohol or tobacco products;

Adult-oriented establishments, as defined in § 7-51-1102 or § 7-51-1401;

Political candidacies, political issue advocacy, or political campaign advertising; or

Any unlawful conduct or activities;

Shall not resemble an official traffic-control device, as defined in § 55-8-101; and

Shall comply with federal outdoor advertising regulations in accordance with 23 U.S.C. § 131.

In consultation with the departments of safety and tourist development, the department of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules necessary to effectuate this section. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

Acts 2015, ch. 454, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-2308 (Acts 2008, ch. 981, § 1; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 21, effective July 1, 2013), concerned human service transportation, the study of coordination of resources, and inventory of grants or expenditures.

4-3-2309. Commercial advertising on the exterior of incident response HELP trucks.

The department is authorized to allot space on the exterior of the incident response HELP trucks and enter into contracts for the purpose of obtaining commercial sponsorship for the HELP program.

All revenue generated from any commercial sponsorship authorized by this section shall be deposited in the highway fund to be used solely for transportation purposes.

Such commercial sponsorship shall not include, identify or promote:

Alcohol or tobacco products;

Adult-oriented establishments, as defined in § 7-51-1102 or § 7-51-1401;

Political candidacies, political issue advocacy, or political campaign advertising as prohibited in § 2-19-144; or

Any unlawful conduct or activities.

The department shall prefer sponsorship by organizations that have a transportation purpose or otherwise promote highway safety.

The sponsorship message shall identify the sponsor as a sponsor of the HELP program and otherwise shall include only the name and logo of the sponsor.

The sponsorship message shall not be located on the front of the vehicle, including the front of the utility compartment, or on the cab of the vehicle, including the doors.

The sponsorship message may be located on the storage compartment doors on either side of the utility compartment or on the back of the vehicle, excluding the message board or arrow board.

The logo of the sponsor shall not exceed four hundred (400) square inches in size, and the lettering identifying the sponsor shall not exceed eight inches (8") in height.

In consultation with the department of safety, the department of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations or adopt policies as needed to effectuate this section.

Acts 2011, ch. 143, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 144, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning commercial advertising on the Tennessee 511 system as §4-3-2309. Since Acts 2011, ch. 143, § 1 added §4-3-2309, ch. 144 was added as §4-3-2310.

Acts 2011, ch. 198, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning a special committee to study improvement of transportation services as §4-3-2309. Since Acts 2011, ch. 143 § 1 added §4-3-2309, ch. 198 was added as §4-3-2311.

4-3-2310. Commercial advertising on the Tennessee 511 system.

The department is authorized to obtain commercial sponsorship of the 511 system and to enter into contracts for this purpose.

All revenue generated from any commercial sponsorship authorized by this section shall be deposited in the highway fund to be used solely for transportation purposes.

Such commercial sponsorship shall not include, identify or promote:

Alcohol or tobacco products;

Adult-oriented establishments, as defined in § 7-51-1102 or § 7-51-1401;

Political candidacies, political issue advocacy, or political campaign advertising, as prohibited in § 2-19-144; or

Any unlawful conduct or activities.

The department shall prefer sponsorships by organizations which have a transportation purpose or otherwise promote highway safety.

In consultation with the department of safety, the department of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations or adopt policies as needed to effectuate this section.

Sponsorship of the 511 system shall be limited to identification of sponsors of a traffic information message. Sponsors' recorded messages shall be not more than fifteen (15) seconds and may precede or follow the traffic information message. The commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee shall review and approve all recorded commercial sponsorship messages.

Acts 2011, ch. 144, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 144, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning commercial advertising on the Tennessee 511 system as §4-3-2309. Since Acts 2011, ch. 143, § 1, added §4-3-2309, ch. 144 was added as §4-3-2310.

4-3-2311. Special committee to study improvement of transportation services.

For purposes of this section, “transportation services” means public transportation services and transportation services for populations needing specialized assistance.

There is hereby created a special committee, to be known as “the coordination committee,” to study the improvement of the methods of delivery and coordination of transportation services by state departments and agencies, as well as transportation provided by local government and nonprofit agencies that are funded by state departments and agencies; the effectiveness of existing services and the need for new types of services; improvements in the effective use of existing funding by state departments and agencies to maximize financial efficiency; reduction of barriers to the effective funding of transportation services; identification of new sources of transportation funding; and improvement of universal mobility for Tennessee citizens and visitors.

The coordination committee shall consist of the following persons and organizations:

One (1) member of the transportation and safety committee of the senate and one (1) other member of the senate, each to be selected by the speaker of the senate;

One (1) member of the transportation committee of the house of representatives and one (1) other member of the house of representatives, each to be selected by the speaker of the house of representatives;

Two (2) representatives of the department of transportation;

One (1) representative of the department of human services;

One (1) representative of the department of children's services;

One (1) representative of the department of finance and administration;

One (1) representative of the Tennessee department of veterans services;

One (1) representative of the bureau of TennCare;

One (1) representative of the commission on aging and disability;

One (1) representative of the Tennessee Public Transportation Association; and

A representative from each department or state agency as deemed necessary by the department of transportation.

The lead agency for supporting and staffing the coordination committee shall be the department of transportation.

All appropriate state agencies shall provide assistance to the coordination committee upon request.

All legislative members of the coordination committee who are duly elected members of the general assembly shall remain members of such committee until the committee reports its findings and recommendations to the general assembly. Nonlegislative members shall serve without compensation.

The coordination committee shall only meet on days when the house of representatives and the senate are otherwise meeting in session or committee.

Departmental representatives on the coordination committee shall represent such department's policy and operational levels. The coordination committee's purpose shall be to regularly coordinate the efforts of each agency as follows:

Improve transportation coordination;

Improve methods of delivery of passenger transportation;

Improve effectiveness of service and improve overall financial efficiency;

Improve universal mobility for Tennessee citizens and visitors; and

Identify opportunities and barriers, and recommend solutions to improve transportation coordination.

The coordination committee shall promote public education about the availability and use of transportation services in this state and provide such information to all departments in state government and to the general public.

The coordination committee is directed to create a strategic transportation coordination plan that will guide its work for the next five (5) years. Such plan shall be updated every five (5) years.

The department of transportation shall present an executive summary for the coordination committee to the transportation and safety committee of the senate and transportation committee of the house of representatives annually.

It is the intent of the general assembly that all departments of state government effectuate this section using existing resources.

Acts 2011, ch. 198, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, §§ 88, 90; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 198, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning a special committee to study improvement of transportation services as §4-3-2309. Since Acts 2011, ch. 143 § 1 added §4-3-2309, ch. 198 was added as §4-3-2311.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans' affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

4-3-2312. Power of commissioner to enter into contracts for the purpose of stabilizing expenses for purchase of gasoline, diesel, or other fuels.
[Effective until June 30, 2016. See Compiler's Notes.]

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the commissioner of transportation may enter into a negotiated contract or contracts with a bank, investment bank or other similar financial institution for the purpose of stabilizing the net expense of the department of transportation in the purchase of gasoline, diesel, or other fuels for the department's own use.

The contracts entered into under this section may include, without limitation, financial instruments commonly referred to as hedges, futures, options, swap transactions, or any similar financial instrument for cost stabilization. The contracts authorized herein shall not be deemed contracts for services subject to former § 12-4-109 [See the Compiler’s Notes].

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the contracts authorized in this section may be procured in such manner pursuant to policy and executed in such form, all as approved by the state chief procurement officer, with the approval of the state funding board. Such policy shall provide, at a minimum, that the initial selection of financial institutions for the purpose of entering into such contracts shall be conducted by a public solicitation and request for qualifications, including credit worthiness and other factors as determined by the state chief procurement officer, with the approval of the state funding board.

When entering into any contract authorized under this section, the written contract shall provide that the rights and remedies of the parties thereto shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation as may bear a reasonable relationship to the transaction; provided, however, that any suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity against this state shall be brought solely in any court of competent jurisdiction in Davidson County.

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

The authority granted under this section is in addition to, and supplemental to, any existing authority granted under any other law but shall expire on June 30, 2016.

Acts 2012, ch. 683, § 1; 2018, ch. 628, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former §12-4-109, referred to in this section, was recodified by Acts 2013, ch, 403, effective July 1, 2013. Provisions similar to former §12-4-109 were transferred to other sections within title 12, ch. 3, parts 1 and 3. See the table of disposition in the compiler's notes under §12-4-101.

Section 4-3-2312 (Acts 2012, ch. 683, § 1), concerning the power of the commissioner to enter into contracts for the purpose of stabilizing expenses for purchase of gasoline, diesel, or other fuels, shall expire on June 30, 2016, by its own provisions.

4-3-2313. Aeronautics economic development fund.

There is hereby created a segregated account within the state treasury to be known as the aeronautics economic development fund.

The aeronautics economic development fund is composed of:

Funds appropriated by the general assembly for the aeronautics economic development fund; and

Gifts, grants, and other donations received by the department of transportation for the aeronautics economic development fund.

Money in the aeronautics economic development fund may be used by the department of transportation for program administration, marketing expenses, and program evaluation; provided, however, such expenses shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount appropriated for the program in any fiscal year.

Subject to the availability of revenue at the end of each fiscal year, the commissioner of finance and administration is authorized to carry forward any amounts remaining in the aeronautics economic development fund or transfer any part of the fund to the revenue fluctuation reserve.

Moneys in the aeronautics economic development fund shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6, for the sole benefit of the aeronautics economic development fund, and interest accruing on investments and deposits of such fund shall be returned to such fund and remain part of the aeronautics economic development fund.

It is the legislative intent that new commitments made by the commissioner of transportation for grants from the aeronautics economic development fund shall not exceed the appropriations made for the purposes of the aeronautics economic development fund. It is further the legislative intent that in each fiscal year the aeronautics economic development fund be managed so that actual expenditures and obligations to be recognized at the end of the fiscal year shall not exceed any available reserves and appropriations of the aeronautics economic development fund.

Acts 2016, ch. 1027, § 1.

4-3-2314. Grants from aeronautics economic development fund.

Grants from the aeronautics economic development fund created by § 4-3-2313 may be made in all counties where the commissioner of transportation determines that such grants will have a direct impact on employment and investment opportunities in the future.

Grants from the aeronautics economic development fund may be made only to local governments or their economic development organizations, other political subdivisions of the state, including airport authorities, or any subdivision of state government.

Grants from the aeronautics economic development fund may be used to facilitate economic development activities related to aeronautics and aeronautics related programs and activities administered by local governments or their economic development organizations, other political subdivisions of the state, including airport authorities, or any subdivision of state government.

Acts 2016, ch. 1027, § 2.